browser/locales/l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX d0 Y 144
SFX d0 er er/n'q'd'l'm't's' er po:infi
SFX d0 er ant/n'q'd'l'm't's' er po:ppre
SFX d0 eter ette/j'n'q'l'm't's' jeter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eter ette/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eter ète/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eler elle/j'n'q'l'm't's' ppeler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eler elle/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eler èle/j'n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eler elle/j'n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 eler èle/j'n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ipre po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX d0 er è/n'q'l'm't' er po:ipre po:1isg
SFX d0 eter ettes/n'q'l'm't' jeter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eter ettes/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eter ètes/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' ppeler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èles/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elles/n'q'l'm't' épeler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èles/n'q'l'm't' épeler po:ipre po:spre po:2sg
SFX d0 er ons/n'q'l't' er po:ipre po:1pl
SFX d0 er ez/n'q'l'm' er po:ipre po:2pl
SFX d0 eter ettent/n'q'l'm't's' jeter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eter ettent/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eter ètent/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eler ellent/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 eler èlent/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX d0 er ais/j'n'q'l'm't' er po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 er ait/n'q'l'm't's' er po:iimp po:3sg
SFX d0 er ions/n'q'l't' er po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX d0 er iez/n'q'l'm' er po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX d0 er aient/n'q'l'm't's' er po:iimp po:3pl
SFX d0 er ai/j'n'q'l'm't' er po:ipsi po:1sg
SFX d0 er as/n'q'l'm't' er po:ipsi po:2sg
SFX d0 er a/n'q'l'm't's' er po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX d0 er âmes/n'q'l't' er po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX d0 er âtes/n'q'l'm' er po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX d0 er èrent/n'q'l'm't's' er po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX d0 eter etterai/j'n'q'l'm't' jeter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eter etterai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eter èterai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eler ellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' ppeler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eler ellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eler èlerai/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eler ellerai/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eler èlerai/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler po:ifut po:1sg
SFX d0 eter etteras/n'q'l'm't' jeter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eter etteras/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eter èteras/n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' ppeler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èleras/n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elleras/n'q'l'm't' épeler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èleras/n'q'l'm't' épeler po:ifut po:2sg
SFX d0 eter ettera/n'q'l'm't's' jeter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eter ettera/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eter ètera/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellera/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlera/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ifut po:3sg
SFX d0 eter etterons/n'q'l't' jeter po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eter etterons/n'q'l't' [^j]eter po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eter èterons/n'q'l't' [^j]eter po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' ppeler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' [^p].eler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerons/n'q'l't' [^p].eler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerons/n'q'l't' épeler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerons/n'q'l't' épeler po:ifut po:1pl
SFX d0 eter etterez/n'q'l'm' jeter po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eter etterez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eter èterez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' ppeler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eler èlerez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eler ellerez/n'q'l'm' épeler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eler èlerez/n'q'l'm' épeler po:ifut po:2pl
SFX d0 eter etteront/n'q'l'm't's' jeter po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eter etteront/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eter èteront/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eler èleront/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eler elleront/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eler èleront/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX d0 eter etterais/j'n'q'l'm't' jeter po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eter etterais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eter èterais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^j]eter po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eler ellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' ppeler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eler ellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èlerais/j'n'q'l'm't' [^p].eler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eler ellerais/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èlerais/j'n'q'l'm't' épeler po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX d0 eter etterait/n'q'l'm't's' jeter po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eter etterait/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eter èterait/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlerait/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eler ellerait/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eler èlerait/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:cond po:3sg
SFX d0 eter etterions/n'q'l't' jeter po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eter etterions/n'q'l't' [^j]eter po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eter èterions/n'q'l't' [^j]eter po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' ppeler po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' [^p].eler po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerions/n'q'l't' [^p].eler po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eler ellerions/n'q'l't' épeler po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eler èlerions/n'q'l't' épeler po:cond po:1pl
SFX d0 eter etteriez/n'q'l'm' jeter po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eter etteriez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eter èteriez/n'q'l'm' [^j]eter po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' ppeler po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eler èleriez/n'q'l'm' [^p].eler po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eler elleriez/n'q'l'm' épeler po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eler èleriez/n'q'l'm' épeler po:cond po:2pl
SFX d0 eter etteraient/n'q'l'm't's' jeter po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eter etteraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eter èteraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^j]eter po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' ppeler po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eler èleraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^p].eler po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eler elleraient/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 eler èleraient/n'q'l'm't's' épeler po:cond po:3pl
SFX d0 er asse/j'n'q'l'm't' er po:simp po:1sg
SFX d0 er asses/n'q'l'm't' er po:simp po:2sg
SFX d0 er ât/n'q'l'm't's' er po:simp po:3sg
SFX d0 er assions/n'q'l't' er po:simp po:1pl
SFX d0 er assiez/n'q'l'm' er po:simp po:2pl
SFX d0 er assent/n'q'l'm't's' er po:simp po:3pl
SFX d0 eter ette/n'l'm't' jeter po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eter ette/n'l'm't' [^j]eter po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eter ète/n'l'm't' [^j]eter po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elle/n'l'm't' ppeler po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elle/n'l'm't' [^p].eler po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èle/n'l'm't' [^p].eler po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eler elle/n'l'm't' épeler po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 eler èle/n'l'm't' épeler po:impe po:2sg
SFX d0 er ons/n'l't' er po:impe po:1pl
SFX d0 er ez/n'l'm' er po:impe po:2pl
